District of Columbia statutes.
3-343.01

Possession of disposable containers prohibited; exceptions.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person shall bring into or have in his or her possession within the Robert F. Kennedy Memorial Stadium or the Baseball Stadium any conveniently disposable container made of glass or metal designed primarily to hold or store beverages or liquids of any kind, including, but not limited to, bottles or cans.

(b)

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to:

(1)

Any person duly authorized or licensed by the Washington Convention and Sports Authority to possess, sell, give away, transport, or store alcoholic beverages or containers within any portion of the Robert F. Kennedy Memorial Stadium or the District of Columbia National Guard Armory or to any employee or agent acting for any such duly authorized or licensed person;

(1A)

Any person duly authorized or licensed by the Washington Convention and Sports Authority or the lessee or operator of the Baseball Stadium to possess, sell, give away, transport, or store alcoholic beverages or containers within any portion of the Baseball Stadium, or to any employee or agent acting for any such duly authorized or licensed person; or

(1B)

[Not funded];

(2)

Activities of the District of Columbia National Guard as provided in § 3-305.

(c)

For the purposes of this section, the term “person” includes any duly authorized or licensed individual, partnership, association, or corporation.

Nov. 3, 1977, D.C. Law 2-37, § 4a
as added July 20, 1996, D.C. Law 11-145, § 3, 43 DCR 2842
June 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-169, § 2(c), 55 DCR 5183
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(h)(1), 57 DCR 181
Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-233, § 201(c), 62 DCR 438
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-233: Section 301 of D.C. Law 20-233 provided (1) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (2) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (3) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(c) of the Soccer Stadium Development Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-557, Dec. 30, 2014, 62 DCR 448, 20 STAT 4467).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082(h)(1) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082(h)(1) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Ballpark Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-316, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3412).
For temporary addition of § 2-343.1 and 2-343.2 1981 Ed., see § 3 of the Omnibus Sports Consolidation Act Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-275, May 29, 1996, 43 DCR 2966).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-233 would have substituted “the Baseball Stadium, or the Soccer Stadium” for “or the Baseball Stadium” in (a); and would have added (b)(1B) and made a related change.
D.C. Law 18-111, in subsecs. (b)(1) and (1A), substituted “Washington Convention and Sports Authority” for “District of Columbia Sports and Entertainment Commission”.
D.C. Law 17-169, in subsec. (a), inserted “or the Baseball Stadium,” following “Stadium”; in subsec. (b)(1), substituted “District of Columbia Sports and Entertainment Commission” for “District of Columbia Sports Commission”, and deleted “or” from the end; and added subsec. (b)(1A).
1981 Ed., § 2-343.1.